Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.143

Lists of all affected producers and handlers—Affected parties responsible for accuracy—Use of lists.

(1) Each commodity commission shall prepare a list of all affected producers from any information available from the department, producers, producer associations, organizations, or handlers of the affected commodity. This list shall contain the names and addresses of all affected persons who produce the affected commodity and the amount, by unit, of the affected commodity produced during at least the past three years.

(2) Each commodity commission shall prepare a list of all persons who handle the affected commodity and the amount of the commodity handled by each person during at least the past three years.

(3) It is the responsibility of all affected parties to ensure that their correct address is filed with the commodity commission. It is also the responsibility of affected parties to submit production data and handling data to the commission as prescribed by the commission's marketing order.

(4) Any qualified person may, at any time, have his or her name placed upon any list for which he or she qualifies by delivering or mailing the information to the commission. The lists shall be corrected and brought up-to-date in accordance with evidence and information provided to the commission.

(5) At the director's request, the commodity commission shall provide the director a certified list of affected producers or affected handlers from the commodity commission records. The list shall contain all information required by the director to conduct a referendum or commission member elections under this chapter.

(6) For all purposes of giving notice and holding referenda on amendment or termination proposals, and for giving notice and electing or selecting members of a commission, the applicable list corrected up to the day preceding the date the list is certified by the commission and mailed to the director is deemed to be the list of all affected producers or affected handlers, as applicable, entitled to notice or to vote. Inadvertent failure to notify an affected producer or handler does not invalidate a proceeding conducted under this chapter.

[ 2002 c 313 s 58.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.